Wisconsin, session 2025, SB822.
do enact as follows:SB822,11Section 1. 146.905 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 146.905 (1r) and 2amended to read:SB822,2,73146.905 (1r) Except as provided in sub. (2), a health care provider, as defined 4in s. 146.81 (1) (a) to (p), that provides a service or a product to an individual with 5coverage under a disability insurance policy, as defined in s. 632.895 (1) (a), may not 6reduce or eliminate or offer to reduce or eliminate coinsurance or a deductible 7required under the terms of the disability insurance policy.SB822,28Section 2. 146.905 (1g) of the statutes is created to read:SB822,2,99146.905 (1g) In this section:SB822,2,1010(a) “Disability insurance policy” has the meaning given in s. 632.895 (1) (a).SB822,2,1111(b) “Health care provider” has the meaning given in s. 146.81 (1) (a) to (p).SB822,312Section 3. 146.905 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB822,2,1513146.905 (2) Subsection (1) (1r) does not apply if payment of the total fee would 14impose an undue financial hardship on the individual receiving the service or 15product.SB822,416Section 4. 146.905 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB822,3,217146.905 (3) (a) It is not a violation of sub. (1r) or s. 628.34 for a health care 1provider to discount a fee owed by an individual who is covered under a disability 2insurance policy if all of the following are satisfied:SB822,3,331. The health care provider does all of the following:SB822,3,64a. Offers the discount for prompt payment for products or services but without 5regard to the issuer of the individual’s disability insurance policy or the individual’s 6reason for seeking the product or service for which the payment is being made.SB822,3,97b. Notifies the issuer of the disability insurance policy of the prompt payment 8discount policy of the health care provider by posting the most up-to-date version of 9the discount policy on the health care provider’s website.SB822,3,1210c. Provides a discount in an amount that bears a reasonable relationship to 11the amount that the health care provider avoids in collection costs by prompt 12payment and is no more than 15 percent of the fee owed.SB822,3,13132. The health care provider does not do any of the following:SB822,3,1414a. Shift the cost of the discount to any other individual or payer.SB822,3,1615b. Include the discount in a price reduction agreement with a 3rd-party payer, 16except as allowed under state or federal law.SB822,3,1917c. Unless required by law, publicly advertise the discount. Merely posting a 18discount policy on a health care provider’s website pursuant to subd. 1. b. does not 19constitute a public advertisement under this subd. 2. c.SB822,4,220d. Provide the discount prior to the service being scheduled or outside of the 21health care provider’s ordinary course of dealing with patients. Under this subd. 2. 22d., the ordinary course of dealing with patients includes when a patient registers for 23or schedules a service, a patient pays their cost-sharing amount, the health care 1provider sends a written statement to a patient by mail or electronic delivery, or 2financial arrangements are made between the health care provider and the patient.SB822,4,33(b) Nothing in par. (a) does any of the following:SB822,4,541. Requires a health care provider to discount a fee owed by an individual who 5is covered under a disability insurance policy.SB822,4,762. Authorizes a discount that conflicts with federal law or regulation, 7including 42 USC 1320a-7b (b) and 42 USC 1320a-7a (a) (5).SB822,4,983. Supersedes the terms of a health care provider’s contract with a disability 9insurance policy unless otherwise agreed by the parties to the contract.SB822,4,1010